Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1. In General

§ 12-8-101.
General penalty for violations.

Any person who violates any provision of this title for which no specific penalty is provided is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 36; 1945, ch. 133, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 53-235; W.S. 1957, § 12-35; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-150; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to revocation of license or permit, see §

12-7-201

.

Quoted

in

Scranton v. Whitlock, 389 P.2d 1015,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 12-8-102.
Manufacturing, rectifying or sale without license or permit; penalties.

Any person who manufactures or rectifies any alcoholic beverage without holding a manufacturer’s license or who possesses a still without holding a manufacturer’s license is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both. Any equipment possessed and used in an illegal manner shall be confiscated by the state and disposed of as directed by the court. Nothing in this subsection shall apply to the manufacture of homemade beer, mead, wine and fermented fruit juice if the total of beer, mead, wine and fermented fruit juice produced during a calendar year does not exceed:

One hundred (100) gallons in a household having one (1) person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older; or

Two hundred (200) gallons in a household having two (2) or more persons who are twenty-one (21) years of age or older.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

12-10-102

, any person who sells any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage without holding a license or permit authorizing the sale is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 32; 1945, ch. 133, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 53-232; W.S. 1957, § 12-31; W.S. 1977, § 12-2-133; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 2016 ch. 86, § 2, effective March 4, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

in (a), substituted “apply to the manufacture of homemade beer, mead, wine and fermented fruit juice if the total of beer, mead, wine and fermented fruit juice produced during a calendar year does not exceed” for “prohibit any person from manufacturing fermented or malt beverages in limited quantities for his sole personal consumption,” and made a related stylistic change in the introductory language; added (a)(i) and (a)(ii); and in (b), added “Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

12-10-102

,” at the beginning.

Laws 2016, ch. 86, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 4, 2016.

Cited

in

Dubray v. Howshar, 884 P.2d 23,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1994).